Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB507.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Baby Food Protection Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Baby food." Food that is pureed or minced to be easily consumed by babies or toddlers under two years of age."Department." The Department of Health AGRICULTURE of the Commonwealth.<--<--12345678910111213141516 "Secretary." The Secretary of Health AGRICULTURE of the Commonwealth."Toxic heavy metal." An individual metal or metal compound that negatively affects the health of individuals.Section 3. Testing of baby food.The department shall test a representative sample of each batch of baby food manufactured in this Commonwealth for the presence of inorganic TOTAL arsenic, lead, cadmium, mercury or other toxic heavy metal.Section 4. Limits on toxic heavy metals.(a) State limits.--Baby food that exceeds the following limits for toxic heavy metals shall not be sold or otherwise distributed in this Commonwealth:(1) For inorganic TOTAL arsenic, 10 parts per billion.(2) For lead, five parts per billion.(3) For cadmium, five parts per billion.(4) For mercury, two parts per billion.(b) Federal limits.--(1) If at any time the United States Food and Drug Administration sets a limit on inorganic TOTAL arsenic, lead, cadmium or mercury in baby food that is lower than the limit specified in subsection (a), the department shall adopt the lower Federal limit.(2) If at any time the United States Food and Drug Administration sets a limit on a toxic heavy metal, other than inorganic TOTAL arsenic, lead, cadmium or mercury, in baby food, the department shall adopt the Federal limit.Section 5. Labeling.All baby food that has been tested by the department under this act must be affixed with a label noting the levels of 20250HB0507PN3672 - 2 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 inorganic TOTAL arsenic, lead, cadmium and mercury found in the representative sample from that batch and the presence of other toxic heavy metals.Section 6. Rules and regulations.The department shall adopt or promulgate any necessary rules or regulations to carry out the provisions of this act.Section 7. Expiration.If Federal legislation is enacted on or after the effective date of this section that regulates the testing or labeling of baby food or the limits on toxic heavy metals in baby food, the following apply:(1) Within 90 days of the enactment of the Federal legislation, the secretary shall determine whether the provisions of this act are substantially similar to the Federal legislation or any part of the Federal legislation.(2) If the secretary determines that the provisions of this act are substantially similar to the Federal legislation or any part of the Federal legislation, within 10 days of that determination, the secretary shall transmit a notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin that the provisions of this act are substantially similar to the Federal legislation or any part of the Federal legislation.(3) Upon publication of the notice described in paragraph (2), the provisions of this act that have been determined to be substantially similar to the Federal legislation or any part of the Federal legislation shall expire.Section 8. Effective date.This act shall take effect in one year.20250HB0507PN3672 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930